South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3564.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 25-11-100. (A) There is hereby established the South Carolina Military Base Task Force Affairs Advisory Council for the purpose of enhancing the value of military installations and facilities and the quality of life for military personnel located in this State sustaining and expanding the military presence in South Carolina. The task force council shall assist coordinate with military communities with such value enhancement, address the various incentives to military personnel assigned in this State, coordinate the efforts of the military communities, and provide for other methods and incentives to accomplish these purposes to support mission readiness for installations and improve the quality of life for service members and their families. The task force council shall coordinate efforts among the public and the private sectors to maintain a the significant presence of the United States Department of Defense and the United States Department of Homeland Security presence in South Carolina. The task force council shall advise the secretary, Governor, and the General Assembly on any issues and strategies related to military base closures, realignments, and mission changes. (B)(1) The task force council shall be comprised of the following members or their designees: (a) South Carolina Adjutant General; (b) Secretary of the South Carolina Department of Commerce; (c) Executive Director of the South Carolina Chamber of Commerce; (d) Chief Executive Officer of the Aiken Chamber of Commerce; (d)(e) Chief Executive Officer of the Beaufort Chamber of Commerce; (e)(f) Chief Executive Officer of the Charleston Metro Chamber of Commerce; (f)(g) Chief Executive Officer of the Columbia Chamber of Commerce; (g)(h) Chief Executive Officer of the Sumter Chamber of Commerce; (i) Chairperson of Aiken County Council; (h)(j) Chairperson of Beaufort County Council; (i)(k) Chairperson of Berkeley County Council; (j)(l) Chairperson of Dorchester County Council; (m) Chairperson of Edgefield County Council (k)(n) Chairperson of Charleston County Council; (l)(o) Chairperson of Richland County Council; (m)(p) Chairperson of Sumter County Council; (q) Mayor of North Augusta; (n)(r) Mayor of Beaufort; (o) (s) Mayor of Charleston; (p)(t) Mayor of Columbia; (q)(u) Mayor of North Charleston; (r)(v) Mayor of Port Royal; (s)(w) Mayor of Sumter; (t)(x) one or more members of the Senate or the House of Representatives appointed by the Governor; and (u)(y) five six at-large members appointed by the Governor who have demonstrated experience in one or more of the following areas:  economic development, defense industry, military installation operation, environmental issues, finance, local government, or senior military leadership, of whom: (i) four five shall represent, respectively, the four five military communities counties of Aiken, Beaufort, Charleston, Columbia Richland, and Sumter, and each shall reside in the military community county that he is appointed to represent;  and (ii) the fifth sixth at-large member shall serve as the task force council chairman. (2) The Governor secretary may designate any one of the members of the task force council as its vice chairman. (C) Staff support and other resources as necessary may be provided through funding by the General Assembly and/or other resources, which shall be administered by the department to assist the task force council in carrying out the directives of this section. (D) The task force chairman shall appoint an council's executive committee consisting shall consist of the chairman; vice chairman, if any; Adjutant General, or his designee; Secretary of Commerce, or his designee; Executive Coordinator, if any; and the four five at-large task force council members who represent the four five military communities counties of Aiken, Beaufort, Charleston, Columbia Richland, and Sumter. (E) The task force council executive committee shall also act as an executive advisory committee to the secretary Governor and the General Assembly on various military matters that affect this State and shall coordinate an annual meeting between the secretary, Governor, military commanders, and General Assembly members geographically representing military communities to discuss items of interest to all parties and exchange pertinent information on the current climate and challenges facing our state's military installations and their personnel. (F) Upon the approval of the secretary, the task force council may pursue specialists to provide information and assistance, develop strategic plans, and assist in executing strategies to support military installations and their related military communities to maximize the potential for increased investment by the United States Department of Defense or other defense-related federal agencies and defense-related businesses in this State. (G) The council shall convene no less than once per year and at such times as requested by the council chair, Secretary, or the Governor. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----